src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! !!!Proper nouns morphology
! =======================

!! !!Table of content
!  ----------------
!! * Continuation lexica
!! * Personal names
!! ** First names
!! ** Surnames
!! * Place names
!  ----------------


! Continuation lexica
! ===================

! Continuation lexica for personal names
! --------------------------------------


LEXICON FirstTag

+N+Prop+Attr:%> # ; !flag#


! At the moment, these continuation lexica are identical. But since I
! suspect that linguistic input will prove that the words behave
! differently, they are kept distinct.

! Names from Sweden


! Vowel final names
! - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON ERVASTI-plcmal
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ERVASTI_FLAG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ERVASTI_FLAG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ERVASTI_FLAG ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:  ERVASTI_FLAG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:  ERVASTI_FLAG ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ERVASTI_FLAG ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ERVASTI_FLAG ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: ERVASTI_FLAG ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-fem
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:  ERVASTI_FLAG ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: ERVASTI_FLAG ;
 

!!€gt-norm: Tunturi # ODD-syllable
!!€ Tunturi:          Tunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr
!!€ Tunturim:         Tunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc   
!!€ Tunturasse:       Tunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Tunturisnie:      Tunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine 
!!€ Tunturistie:      Tunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela 
!!€ Tunturinie:       Tunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com 
!!€ Tunturinie:       Tunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess   
 
LEXICON ERVASTI_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ ERVASTI ;
LEXICON ERVASTI ! Names ending in stressless vowel
    +Sg:        INAME_ODD_SG   ;
    +Sg+Nom:%>i FINAL1 ;
    +Cmp/SgNom:%>i RHyph ; ! ERVASTI-muorra, Ervasti-dállu etc. RHyph er Cmp.
    +Cmp/SgGen:%>i RHyph ;
        +Pl:          N_ODD_PL  ;
                  N_ODD_ESS ;
          +Attr:%>i FINAL1    ;

LEXICON ERVASTI_PLC-ORG_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ ERVASTI_PLC-ORG ;
LEXICON ERVASTI_PLC-ORG ! Names ending in stressless vowel
   +Sg: N_ODD_SG  ;
    +Cmp/SgNom:RHyph     ;
    +Cmp/SgGen:RHyph     ;
!+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
        N_ODD_ESS ;
 +Attr: FINAL1    ;


LEXICON ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH-mal
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_FLAG ;

LEXICON ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH-ani
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_FLAG ;

LEXICON ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH-fem
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_FLAG ;

LEXICON ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

!LEXICON ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH-org
!+N+Prop+Sem/Org: ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

!LEXICON ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH-PL-plc
!ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH-PL ;

!LEXICON ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH-PL
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:e         FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_FLAG ;

LEXICON ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH ;
LEXICON ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH ! Names ending in stressless vowel
   +Sg:  N_ODD_SG_NO_DISIMPH ;
  +Cmp/SgNom:e RHyph               ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:e RHyph               ;
   +Pl:  N_ODD_PL_NO_DISIMPH ;
         N_ODD_ESS           ;
 +Attr:e FINAL1              ;

LEXICON ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_PLC-ORG_FLAG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_PLC-ORG ;
LEXICON ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_PLC-ORG ! Names ending in stressless vowel
   +Sg: N_ODD_SG_NO_DISIMPH ;
  +Cmp/SgNom: RHyph               ;
  +Cmp/SgGen: RHyph               ;
!+Pl: N_ODD_PL_NO_DISIMPH ;
        N_ODD_ESS           ;
 +Attr: FINAL1              ;


LEXICON N_ODD_SG_NO_DISIMPH
       +Nom:e        FINAL1 ;
 +Nom+PxSg1:%>amme   FINAL1 ;
 +Nom+PxSg2:%>adth   FINAL1 ;
       +Acc:e%>m     FINAL1 ;
 +Acc+PxSg2:%>amth   FINAL1 ;
       +Gen:e%>n     FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg1:%>anne   FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg2:%>anne   FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg3:%>anne   FINAL1 ;
       +Ill:%>asse   FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +Ill+PxSg2:%>assedh FINAL1 ;
       +Ine:%>isnie  FINAL1 ;
       +Ela:%>istie  FINAL1 ;
       +Com:%>inie   FINAL1 ;
 +Com+PxSg2:%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;

LEXICON N_ODD_PL_NO_DISIMPH
         +Nom:%>h       FINAL1 ;
         +Acc:%>idie    FINAL1 ;
         +Gen:%>i       FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:%>idie    FINAL1 ;
         +Ine:%>inie    FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:%>ijstie  FINAL1 ;
         +Com:%>igujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Err/Orth:%>igyjmie FINAL1 ; !
 +Com+Err/Orth:%>igojmie FINAL1 ; !


!LEXICON VNAME_EVEN ! Names ending in stressless vowel
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg: NIEJTE_SG ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:e          RHyph ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:    EVEN_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr:e FINAL1 ;





LEXICON VNAME-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ACCRA_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON VNAME-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: ACCRA_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON VNAME-sur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA_FLAG ;

LEXICON VNAME-mal
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ACCRA_FLAG ;

LEXICON VNAME-fem
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ACCRA_FLAG ;

!LEXICON VNAME-obj
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: ACCRA_FLAG ;

LEXICON ACCRA-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ACCRA_FLAG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA_FLAG ;

LEXICON ACCRA_MWE-plc
ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON ACCRA-A-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ACCRA-A_FLAG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA-A_FLAG ;

LEXICON ACCRA-A_MWE-plc
ACCRA-A-plc ;

LEXICON ACCRA-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: ACCRA_FLAG ;

LEXICON ACCRA-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA_FLAG ;

LEXICON ACCRA-mal       
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ACCRA_FLAG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»tj ACCRATJE    ; ! Arve->Arvetje, Andy->Andytje, 

LEXICON ACCRA-fem         
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ACCRA_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»tj ACCRATJE    ; !Tone-> Tonetje, 

LEXICON ACCRA-A-fem         
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ACCRA-A_FLAG ;

LEXICON ACCRA-A-org         
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: ACCRA-A_FLAG ;


LEXICON ACCRA-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: ACCRA_FLAG ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-ani
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: ACCRA_FLAG ;

! Separate lexicon for ACCRA y final names because these have to go NYSTØ in smj, but cannot be NYSTØ in sma

LEXICON ACCRA-Y-fem 
 ACCRA-fem ;
  
LEXICON ACCRA-Y-obj
 ACCRA-obj ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-Y-plc
 ACCRA-plc ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-Y_MWE-plc
 ACCRA-plc ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-Y-mal
 ACCRA-mal ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-Y-sur
 ACCRA-sur ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-Y-malsur
 ACCRA-sur ;
 ACCRA-mal ;

 
LEXICON ACCRA-Y-org
 ACCRA-org ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-Y-ani
 ACCRA-ani ;


! ACCCRA- må tilpasses mer vokalstammene , a-e og oe.

LEXICON ACCRATJE   @U.Cap.Obl@ GÅATETJE ;
LEXICON ACCRA_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA    ;
LEXICON ACCRA-A_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ A-A_DECL    ;

LEXICON A-A_DECL
 +Sg+Nom:a%>   FINAL1   ;
 +Sg+Acc:a%>m   FINAL1   ;
 +Sg+Gen:a%>n   FINAL1   ;
 +Sg+Ill:e%>se  FINAL1   ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1   ;
 +Sg+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1   ;
 +Sg+Com:%>ne  FINAL1   ;
 +Pl+Nom:a%>h       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>de      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:a%>jde FINAL1    ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>j       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>de      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ine:%>ne      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ela:%>jste    FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com:a%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:a%>jgyjmie FINAL1 ; !

+Ess:%>ne FINAL1 ;
   +Attr:a%>   FINAL1   ;
   +Cmp/SgNom:a%>   RHyph    ;
   +Cmp/SgGen:a%>n   RHyph    ;
