src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
ACTA:ACTA VNAME-org ;
Amnesty:Amnesty VNAME-org ;
Amy:Amy VNAME-fem ;
Anny:Anny VNAME-fem ;
Anthony:Anthony VNAME-mal ;
Audny:Audny VNAME-fem ;
Aylesbury:Ayles^bury VNAME-plc ;
Benny:Benny VNAME-mal ;
Berly:Berly VNAME-fem ;
Berny:Berny VNAME-mal ;
Berry:Berry VNAME-mal ;
Betsy:Betsy VNAME-fem ;
Betty:Betty VNAME-fem ;
Betzy:Betzy VNAME-fem ;
Borgny:Borgny VNAME-fem ;
Burnley:Burnley VNAME-plc ;
Caspary:Caspary VNAME-mal ;
Chambéry:Chambéry VNAME-plc ;
Cindy:Cindy VNAME-fem ;
Coney:Coney VNAME-plc ;
Conny:Conny VNAME-mal ;
Dagny:Dagny VNAME-fem ;
Dorothy:Dorothy VNAME-fem ;
EFTA:EFTA VNAME-org ;
Eddy:Eddy VNAME-mal ;
Elijssá:Elijssá VNAME-fem ;
Elsilä:Elsilä VNAME-sur ;
Elssá:Elssá VNAME-fem ;
Emly:Emly VNAME-mal ;
Emmy:Emmy VNAME-fem ;
Enderbury:Ender^bury VNAME-plc ;
Erry:Erry VNAME-mal ;
Evá:Evá VNAME-fem ;
FIFA:FIFA VNAME-org ;
Freddy:Freddy VNAME-mal ;
Garry:Garry VNAME-mal ;
Gary:Gary VNAME-mal ;
Gudny:Gudny VNAME-fem ;
Gyorgy:Gyorgy VNAME-mal ;
Hardy:Hardy VNAME-mal ;
Harry:Harry VNAME-mal ;
Harvey:Harvey VNAME-mal ;
Heikkilä:Heikkilä VNAME-sur ;
Heiniö:Heiniö VNAME-plc ;
Henny:Henny VNAME-fem ;
Henry:Henry VNAME-mal ;
Hillary:Hillary VNAME-fem ;
Hirvelä:Hirvelä VNAME-sur ;
Hyytiä:Hyytiä VNAME-sur ;
Häivälä:Häivälä VNAME-plc ;
Härkälä:Härkälä VNAME-sur ;
Hölsö:Hölsö VNAME-plc ;
Höylä:Höylä VNAME-sur ;
IATA:IATA VNAME-org ;
IKEA:IKE^A VNAME-org ;
Iiddá:Iiddá VNAME-fem ;
Irrawaddy:Irrawaddy VNAME-plc ;
Jenny:Jenny VNAME-fem ;
Jeremy:Jeremy VNAME-mal ;
Jerry:Jerry VNAME-mal ;
Jimmy:Jimmy VNAME-mal ;
Johnny:Johnny VNAME-mal ;
Johny:Johny VNAME-mal ;
Johá:Johá VNAME-mal ;
Jonny:Jonny VNAME-mal ;
Joná:Joná VNAME-mal ;
José:José VNAME-mal ;
Jyrkkä:Jyrkkä VNAME-sur ;
Jyrälä:Jyrälä VNAME-plc ;
Jääskä:Jääskä VNAME-sur ;
Kelly:Kelly VNAME-fem ;
Kemilä:Kemilä VNAME-plc ;
Kenny:Kenny VNAME-mal ;
Kilkenny:Kilkenny VNAME-plc ;
Kilpelä:Kilpelä VNAME-sur ;
Kitty:Kitty VNAME-fem ;
Kiviniitty:Kivi^niitty VNAME-sur ;
Klemettilä:Klemettilä VNAME-plc ;
Krabowsky:Krabowsky VNAME-sur ;
Kähkölä:Kähkölä VNAME-plc ;
Käkelä:Käkelä VNAME-sur ;
Käsmä:Käsmä VNAME-plc ;
Kääriä:Kääriä VNAME-sur ;
Leikny:Leikny VNAME-fem ;
Leiniö:Leiniö VNAME-plc ;
Leiviskä:Leiviskä VNAME-sur ;
Liberty:Liberty VNAME-fem ;
Lilly:Lilly VNAME-fem ;
Londonderry:London^derry VNAME-plc ;
László:László VNAME-mal ;
Lähteelä:Lähteelä VNAME-sur ;
Maceió:Mace^ió VNAME-plc ;
Magny:Magny VNAME-fem ;
Marry:Marry VNAME-fem ;
Meriö:Meriö VNAME-plc ;
Mikkilä:Mikkilä VNAME-sur ;
Milly:Milly VNAME-fem ;
MuVá:MuVá VNAME-org ;
Mylly:Mylly VNAME-fem ;
Myyrä:Myyrä VNAME-fem ;
Márgreittá:Már^greittá VNAME-fem ;
Mäkilä:Mäkilä VNAME-sur ;
Mäkiö:Mäkiö VNAME-plc ;
Mänty:Mänty VNAME-sur ;
Määttälä:Määttälä VNAME-plc ;
NIPIAA:NIPIAA VNAME-org ;
Nanny:Nanny VNAME-fem ;
Nelly:Nelly VNAME-fem ;
Niemelä:Niemelä VNAME-sur ;
Niillá:Niillá VNAME-mal ;
Nikkilä:Nikkilä VNAME-plc ;
Novotny:Novotny VNAME-sur ;
Odny:Odny VNAME-fem ;
Olá:Olá VNAME-mal ;
Paranaguá:Paranaguá VNAME-plc ;
Perly:Perly VNAME-fem ;
Perry:Perry VNAME-mal ;
Perttilä:Perttilä VNAME-sur ;
Peräkylä:Perä^kylä VNAME-plc ;
Pirilä:Pirilä VNAME-sur ;
Pitkälä:Pitkälä VNAME-sur ;
Pondicherry:Pondi^cherry VNAME-plc ;
Proxy:Proxy VNAME-org ;
Pyhälä:Pyhälä VNAME-sur ;
Pyörälä:Pyörälä VNAME-plc ;
Pyötsiä:Pyötsiä VNAME-sur ;
Pätilä:Pätilä VNAME-sur ;
Pöykiö:Pöykiö VNAME-plc ;
Pöyry:Pöyry VNAME-sur ;
REMA:REMA VNAME-org ;
Remy:Remy VNAME-mal ;
Riihelä:Riihelä VNAME-sur ;
Ristiinná:Ristiinná VNAME-fem ;
Ristilä:Ristilä VNAME-sur ;
Ronny:Ronny VNAME-mal ;
Rytkölä:Rytkölä VNAME-plc ;
Räihä:Räihä VNAME-sur ;
Rättö:Rättö VNAME-plc ;
Rönkä:Rönkä VNAME-sur ;
Röytiö:Röytiö VNAME-plc ;
Setälä:Setälä VNAME-plc ;
Signy:Signy VNAME-fem ;
Similä:Similä VNAME-sur ;
Skovly:Skov^ly VNAME-plc ;
Spotify:Spotify VNAME-org ;
Stanley:Stanley VNAME-mal ;
Surtsey:Surtsey VNAME-plc ;
Syrjä:Syrjä VNAME-sur ;
Sárá:Sárá VNAME-fem ;
Säisä:Säisä VNAME-plc ;
Säärelä:Säärelä VNAME-sur ;
Tonny:Tonny VNAME-mal ;
Torgny:Torgny VNAME-mal ;
Torquay:Torquay VNAME-plc ;
Tykkä:Tykkä VNAME-sur ;
Tyyskä:Tyyskä VNAME-sur ;
Törmälä:Törmälä VNAME-plc ;
UEFA:UEFA VNAME-org ;
Vepsä:Vepsä VNAME-plc ;
Vicky:Vicky VNAME-fem ;
Vierelä:Vierelä VNAME-sur ;
Villy:Villy VNAME-mal ;
Väinölä:Väinölä VNAME-plc ;
Välkky:Välkky VNAME-sur ;
Willy:Willy VNAME-mal ;
ÁJA:ÁJA VNAME-org ;
Ámmá:Ámmá VNAME-mal ;
Ánddijá:Ánddijá VNAME-plc ;
Äijälä:Äijälä VNAME-sur ;
